Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.130

Jury may view premises.

The court may upon the motion of such city or of any defendant direct that said jury (under the charge of any officer of the court and accompanied by such person or persons as may be appointed by the court to point out the property sought to be taken or damaged) shall view the lands and property affected by said improvement.

[ 1907 c 153 s 9; RRS s 9223. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 9; 1893 c 84 s 9.]

NOTES:

View of premises by jury: RCW 4.44.270.